Tennessee, session 114, SB0821.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 6, Part 10, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) Each LEA and public charter school shall annually implement an evidence-
based substance abuse and violence prevention program in each school that serves
students in any of the grades three through twelve (3-12) to reduce tobacco, alcohol,
and illicit drug use by students.
(b) The program selected by the LEA or public charter school must:
(1) Include drug-prevention-related education that promotes anti-drug
norms and teaches drug-refusal skills and life skills training that fosters the
development of personal self-management skills and general social skills;
(2) Be provided to students throughout the school year; and
(3) Supplement, not supplant, any other drug abuse or life skills
education provided by the LEA or public charter school, including, but not limited
to, the drug abuse resistance education (DARE) required in chapter 1, part 4 of
this title, the character education required in § 49-6-1007, any instruction
required as part of a coordinated school health program, and the family life
instruction required in part 13 of this chapter.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to the 2025-2026 school year and each school year thereafter.
SB0821
002875
- 1 -